Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.10.200

Election campaign. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

"Election campaign" means any campaign in support of or in opposition to a candidate for election to public office and any campaign in support of, or in opposition to, a ballot proposition.

[ 2024 c 164 s 220.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.